Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 6. Enforcement.

Sec. 06.55.601.
Suspension and revocation; receivership.

The department may suspend or revoke a money services license, place a money services licensee in receivership, or order a money services licensee to revoke the designation of an authorized delegate if

the money services licensee violates this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter;

the money services licensee does not cooperate with an examination or investigation by the department;

the money services licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence;

an authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or federal anti-money laundering statute, or violates a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter, as a result of the money services licensee’s wilful misconduct or wilful blindness;

the competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the money services licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a money services licensee, or responsible person of the money services licensee or authorized delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the person to provide money services;

the money services licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice;

the money services licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors; or

the money services licensee does not remove an authorized delegate after the department issues and serves upon the money services licensee a final order including a finding that the authorized delegate has violated this chapter.

In determining whether a money services licensee is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the department may consider the size and condition of the money services licensee’s money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of this chapter, and the previous conduct of the person involved.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.602.
Suspension and revocation of authorized delegates.

The department may issue an order suspending or revoking the designation of an authorized delegate if the department finds that

the authorized delegate violated this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter;

the authorized delegate did not cooperate with an examination or investigation by the department;

the authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence;

the authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or federal anti-money laundering statute;

the competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the authorized delegate or a person in control of the authorized delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the authorized delegate to provide money services; or

the authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice.

In determining whether an authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the department may consider the size and condition of the authorized delegate’s provision of money services, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, and the previous conduct of the authorized delegate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.603.
Orders to cease and desist.

If the department determines that a violation of this chapter or of a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter by a money services licensee or authorized delegate is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the money services licensee, its customers, or the public as a result of the violation, or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets of the money services licensee, the department may issue an order requiring the money services licensee or authorized delegate to cease and desist from the violation. The order becomes effective on service of it on the money services licensee or authorized delegate.

The department may issue an order against a money services licensee to cease and desist from providing money services through an authorized delegate who is the subject of a separate order by the department.

An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding under AS

06.55.601

or

06.55.602

.

A money services licensee or an authorized delegate who is served with an order to cease and desist may petition the superior court for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an administrative proceeding under AS

06.55.601

or

06.55.602

.

An order to cease and desist expires unless the department commences an administrative proceeding under AS

06.55.601

or

06.55.602

within 10 days after it is issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.604.
Consent orders.

The department may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom it is issued or by the person’s authorized representative and must indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that it does not constitute an admission by a person that this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter has been violated.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.605.
Civil penalties.

The department may assess a civil penalty against a person who violates this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter in an amount not to exceed $1,000 each day for each day the violation is outstanding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.606.
Criminal penalties.

A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this chapter or who intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in a record filed or required to be maintained under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

A person who knowingly engages in an activity for which a money services license is required under this chapter without being licensed as a money services licensee and who receives more than $500 in compensation within a 30-day period from this activity is guilty of a class C felony.

A person who knowingly engages in an activity for which a money services license is required under this chapter without being licensed as a money services licensee and who receives no more than $500 in compensation within a 30-day period from this activity is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Cross references. --

For penalties for felonies, see AS

12.55.035

for fines and

12.55.125

for imprisonment.
For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

for fines and

12.55.135

for imprisonment.

Sec. 06.55.607.
Unlicensed persons.

If the department has reason to believe that a person has violated or is violating AS

06.55.101

or

06.55.201

, the department may issue an order to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not issue requiring that the person cease and desist from the violation of AS

06.55.101

or

06.55.201

.

In an emergency, the department may petition the superior court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order.

An order to cease and desist becomes effective upon service of it upon the person.

An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding under AS

06.55.701

and

06.55.702

.

A person who is served with an order to cease and desist for violating AS

06.55.101

or

06.55.201

may petition the superior court for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an administrative proceeding under AS

06.55.701

and

06.55.702

.

An order to cease and desist expires unless the department commences an administrative proceeding within 10 days after it is issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)